test/src/gt-norm-yamls/Num_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below) Giellagaldu
# https://docs.google.com/spreadsheets/d/17517DVbQFJjpHbbL0105G8I-tVi8QkVk/edit#gid=734567880
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Numeral - miljon ATOM: # Numeral 'million/miljoona' - full paradigm

    miljon+Num+Sg+Nom:	miljon					 
    miljon+Num+Sg+Gen:  miljoon					 
    miljon+Num+Sg+Akk:	miljoon					 
    miljon+Num+Sg+Ill:  miljooʹne				 
    miljon+Num+Sg+Lok:  miljoonâst				 
    miljon+Num+Sg+Kom:	miljoonin				 
    miljon+Num+Sg+Abe:  [miljoontää, miljoontaa] 
    miljon+Num+Ess:  miljoonân				 
    miljon+Num+Par:  miljoonâd				 


    miljon+Num+Pl+Nom: miljoon
    miljon+Num+Pl+Gen: miljooni
    miljon+Num+Pl+Akk: miljoonid
    miljon+Num+Pl+Ill: miljoonid
    miljon+Num+Pl+Lok: miljoonin
    miljon+Num+Pl+Kom: miljoonivuiʹm
    miljon+Num+Pl+Abe: [miljoonitää, miljoonitaa]
